Louisiana, session 2026, SB414.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 15 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:1501 through 1504, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 15. MEDICAL DEBT PROTECTIONS
§1501. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Louisiana
Medical Debt Protection Act".
§1502. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Medical creditor" means any entity that provides healthcare
services and to whom the consumer owes money for healthcare services, or the
entity that provided healthcare services and to whom the consumer previously
owed money if the medical debt has been purchased by one or more debt
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 414 ENROLLED
buyers.
(2)(a) "Medical debt" means debt arising from healthcare services,
including products, devices, durable medical equipment, and prescription
drugs, and from the provisions of transportation to healthcare services.
(b) "Medical debt" does not include either of the following:
(i) An open-end or closed-end extension of credit made by a federally
insured financial institution, its subsidiaries, or affiliates.
(ii) A debt charged to a credit card.
(3) "Medical debt collector" means any person that regularly collects or
attempts to collect, directly or indirectly, medical debts originally owed or due
or asserted to be owed or due to another. A medical debt buyer shall be
considered a medical debt collector for all purposes.
(4) "Medically necessary care" means healthcare services, products, or
medications that a licensed healthcare provider determines are necessary to
prevent, diagnose, or treat an illness, injury, disease, or its symptoms, and that
meet accepted standards of care.
§1503. Interest rate limitation
Interest on medical debt arising from medically necessary care shall not
exceed three percent per annum. Any contractual provision imposing a higher
rate is void.
§1504. Enforcement
A. The attorney general may enforce the provisions of this Chapter and
seek civil penalties.
B. The attorney general shall establish a complaint process whereby an
aggrieved consumer or any member of the public may file a complaint against
a medical creditor or medical debt collector who violates any provision of this
Chapter. All complaints shall be considered public records pursuant to R.S.
44:1 et seq., with the exception of the complainant's name, address, or other
personal identifying information, which shall be considered confidential and
redacted from the complaint.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 414 ENROLLED
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.